Mississippi, session 2026, HB1529.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 25-1-77, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-1-77.  (1)  There is created the Bureau of Fleet Management within the Office of Purchasing, Travel and Fleet Management, Department of Finance and Administration, for the purposes of coordinating and promoting efficiency and economy in the purchase, lease, rental, acquisition, use, maintenance and disposal of vehicles by state agencies.  The Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration may employ a Fleet Management Officer to manage the bureau and carry out its purposes.  The bureau may employ other suitable and competent personnel as necessary.  The bureau shall encourage the use of fuel efficient or hybrid vehicles appropriate for the state agency's intended purpose and, when feasible, the use of alternative fuels or energy sources, including, but not limited to, ethanol, biodiesel, natural gas or electric power.  The bureau shall prepare a fiscal analysis of the cost-effectiveness of using alternative fuel or energy source vehicles by state agencies, and submit a report of that fiscal analysis to the Legislature by December 15, 2009.  Not later than July 1, 2014, at least seventy-five percent (75%) of all vehicles to which the bureau holds title in the name of the state must have a fuel economy estimate by the United States Environmental Protection Agency of forty (40) miles per gallon or higher for highway driving. (2)  The Bureau of Fleet Management shall perform the following duties: (a)  To hold title in the name of the State of Mississippi to all vehicles currently in possession of state agencies as defined in Section 25-9-107(d) and to assign vehicles to such agencies for use; however, the bureau shall exempt any agency or agency vehicles from the provisions of this paragraph (a) if it determines that state or federal law requires that title be vested only in the agency; (b)  To establish rules and regulations for state agency use of vehicles; (c)  To gather information and specify proper fleet management practices for state agencies; (d)  To acquire fleet management software and require agencies to provide necessary information for the bureau to properly monitor the size, use, maintenance and disposal of the state's fleet of vehicles; the bureau shall communicate regularly with the fleet managers of each state agency to determine strengths and weaknesses of the various fleet operations; the bureau shall disseminate information to the agencies so that each can take advantage of any beneficial practices being incorporated at other entities; the bureau shall promulgate rules and regulations concerning the mileage reimbursement practices of each state agency; (e)  To carry out responsibilities relative to budget recommendations as provided in Section 27-103-129; (f)  To reassign vehicles in the possession of any state agency if the bureau believes that another state agency can make more efficient use of a vehicle * * *.; (g)  To investigate at any time the vehicle usage practices of any state agency; and (h)  To require each agency to submit to the bureau a vehicle acquisition/use/disposal plan on an annual basis.  From the plans received, the bureau shall evaluate the proposed plans and shall submit a recommendation to the Legislature prior to January 1 of each year. (3)  No state department, institution or agency shall purchase, rent, lease or acquire any motor vehicle, regardless of the source of funds from which the motor vehicle is to be purchased, except under authority granted by the Department of Finance and Administration.  The Bureau of Fleet Management, Department of Finance and Administration, shall promulgate rules and regulations governing the purchase, rental, lease or acquisition of any motor vehicle by a state department, institution or agency with regard to the appropriateness of the vehicle to its intended use.  The Bureau of Fleet Management, Department of Finance and Administration, shall only grant authority to purchase, rent, lease or acquire a motor vehicle which is the lowest cost vehicle to carry out its intended use.  Before the disposal or sale of any vehicle, the Bureau of Fleet Management shall make a determination that the lifetime use and mileage of the vehicle has been maximized and that it would not be feasible for another state agency to use the vehicle. (4)  The department, institution or agency shall maintain proper documentation which provides the intended use of the vehicle and the basis for choosing the vehicle.  Such documentation shall show that the department, institution or agency made diligent efforts to purchase, rent, lease or acquire a vehicle that is the lowest cost vehicle for its intended use.  Such documentation shall be updated as needed when the intended use of the vehicle or any other facts concerning the vehicle are changed.  All such documentation shall be approved by the State Fleet Officer prior to purchase, rental, lease or acquisition or change in use of any vehicle and shall be maintained and made available for review by the State Auditor, any other reviewing agency and the Legislature.  The Bureau of Fleet Management shall immediately notify the department head of any agency that has a vehicle found to be in violation of the bureau's rules and regulations.  At the same time, the bureau shall notify the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the Lieutenant Governor of its findings regarding any such vehicle.  If the violation is not rectified within five (5) days of the notice, then the bureau may seize the vehicle and dispose of it as the bureau deems to be in the best interest of the State of Mississippi. (5)  On or before September 1 of each year, the Bureau of Fleet Management shall prepare and deliver to the Senate and House Appropriations Committees and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee a report containing any irregularities that it finds concerning purchases of state-owned vehicles. (6)  The Department of Public Safety and the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks may retain any vehicle seized pursuant to the forfeiture laws of this state, and the total number of vehicles assigned to each such agency shall not be reduced by the number of seized vehicles which the agency retains. (7)  The Bureau of Fleet Management, upon request, shall grant an exemption from the provisions of this section for only any vehicle assigned to a sworn officer of the Department of Public Safety or of the Agricultural and Livestock Theft Bureau of the Department of Agriculture and Commerce and used in undercover operations when the bureau determines that compliance could jeopardize the life, health or safety of the sworn officer. (8)  The provisions of this section shall not apply to any state institution of higher learning. (9)  When making requests for authority to purchase, rent, lease or acquire vehicles as provided in subsection (3) of this section, agencies shall submit the lowest cost vehicle possible to carry out its intended use.  Any such request shall be in writing from the agency head, certifying the vehicle requested is the lowest cost option available and acknowledging that any request contrary to this provision shall subject the agency head to penalties as provided in Sections 25-1-91, 31-7-55 and 31-7-57, where applicable.  The Bureau of Fleet Management shall only approve the lowest cost vehicle, which in its estimation, will carry out the intended use.  No agency may purchase any vehicle that the Bureau of Fleet Management has disapproved as being a higher cost option. (10)  No requests authorized under subsections (3) and (9) of this section shall be approved by the Bureau of Fleet Management if the requesting agency has not properly maintained in the fleet/asset reporting system all information required by the Bureau of Fleet Management.  Agencies shall correct any inadequacies or discrepancies in the system noted by the Bureau of Fleet Management before the bureau may approve any requests. (11)  In cooperation with other units of the Department of Finance and Administration, the Bureau of Fleet Management shall review the travel records of any state employees who receive travel reimbursement for their use of private vehicles and shall ascertain the identities of all such employees and their employing agency in cases where the employee has received reimbursement for travel in excess of Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) in the most recently completed fiscal year.  The Department of Finance and Administration, working in conjunction with the agency employing such employees, shall make arrangements for the employee to use either a newly purchased vehicle or an available underutilized vehicle currently on state inventory. (12)  (a)  For purposes of this subsection (12), the term "underutilized vehicle" means a passenger vehicle that was driven less than eight thousand two hundred (8,200) miles in state fiscal year 2025.  For purposes of this subsection (12), the term "agency" means that term as defined in Section 25-9-107. (b)  The Bureau of Fleet Management shall require all agencies to report the following information to the bureau by October 1, 2026: (i)  A list of all underutilized passenger vehicles, including their purpose, location and value; (ii)  A listing of all underutilized vehicles that the agency agrees should be disposed of through auction; and (iii)  The rationale for keeping underutilized vehicles on the inventory. (c)  The Bureau of Fleet Management shall report to the Legislature no later than December 31, 2026, on the cost savings to date from efforts to reduce the number of underutilized vehicles and the number of employees who used private vehicles with reimbursement for milage in excess of Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) in the most recently completed fiscal year. SECTION 2.  Section 25-53-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-53-5.  The authority shall have the following powers, duties, and responsibilities: (a)  The authority shall provide for the development of plans for the efficient acquisition and utilization of information technology by all agencies of state government, and provide for their implementation.  In so doing, the authority may use the ITS' staff, at the discretion of the executive director of the authority, or the authority may contract for the services of qualified consulting firms in the field of information technology and utilize the service of such consultants as may be necessary for such purposes. (b)  The authority shall immediately institute procedures for carrying out the purposes of this chapter and supervise the efficient execution of the powers and duties of the executive director of the ITS.  In the execution of its functions under this chapter, the authority shall maintain as a paramount consideration the successful internal organization and operation of the several agencies so that efficiency existing therein shall not be adversely affected or impaired.  In executing its functions in relation to the institutions of higher learning and junior colleges in the state, the authority shall take into consideration the special needs of such institutions in relation to the fields of teaching and scientific research. (c)  The authority shall adopt rules, regulations, and procedures governing the acquisition of information technology which shall, to the fullest extent practicable, ensure the maximum of competition between all manufacturers of supplies or equipment or services.  In the writing of specifications, in the making of contracts relating to the acquisition of such information technology, and in the performance of its other duties the authority shall provide for the maximum compatibility of all information systems hereafter installed or utilized by all state agencies and may require the use of common computer languages where necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.  The authority may establish by regulation and charge reasonable fees on a nondiscriminatory basis for the furnishing to bidders of copies of bid specifications and other documents issued by the authority. (d)  The authority shall adopt rules and regulations governing the sharing with, or the sale or lease of information technology services to any nonstate agency or person. Such regulations shall provide that any such sharing, sale or lease shall be restricted in that same shall be accomplished only where such services are not readily available otherwise within the state, and then only at a charge to the user not less than the prevailing rate of charge for similar services by private enterprise within this state. (e)  The authority may, in its discretion, establish a special technical advisory committee or committees to study and make recommendations on matters within the competence of the authority as the authority may see fit.  Persons serving on any such committees shall be entitled to receive their actual and necessary expenses actually incurred in the performance of such duties, together with mileage as provided by law for state employees, provided the same has been authorized by a resolution duly adopted by the authority and entered on its minutes prior to the performance of such duties.  For the purposes of this paragraph, such committee meetings are exempt from the requirements of Sections 25-41-1 through 25-41-17. (f)  The authority may provide for the development and require the adoption of standardized computer programs and may provide for the dissemination of information to and the establishment of training programs for the personnel of the various information technology centers of state agencies and personnel of the agencies utilizing the services thereof. (g)  The authority shall adopt reasonable rules and regulations requiring the reporting to the authority through the office of executive director of such information as may be required for carrying out the purposes of this chapter and may also establish such reasonable procedures to be followed in the presentation of bills for payment under the terms of all contracts for the acquisition of information technology now or hereafter in force as may be required by the authority or by the executive director in the execution of their powers and duties. (h)  The authority shall require such adequate documentation of information technology procedures utilized by the various state agencies and may require the establishment of such organizational structures within state agencies relating to information technology operations as may be necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter. (i)  The authority may adopt such further reasonable rules and regulations as may be necessary to fully implement the purposes of this chapter.  All rules and regulations adopted by the authority shall be published in readily accessible form to all affected state agencies, and to all current suppliers of computer equipment and services to the state, and to all prospective suppliers requesting the same. Such rules and regulations shall be kept current, be periodically revised, and copies thereof shall be available at all times for inspection by the public at reasonable hours in the offices of the authority.  Whenever possible no rule, regulation or any proposed amendment to such rules and regulations shall be finally adopted or enforced until copies of the proposed rules and regulations have been published. (j)  The authority shall establish rules and regulations which shall provide for the submission of all contracts proposed to be executed by the executive director for information technology, including cloud computing, to the authority for approval before final execution, and the authority may provide that such contracts involving the expenditure of less than such specified amount as may be established by the authority may be finally executed by the executive director without first obtaining such approval by the authority. (k)  The authority is authorized to consider new technologies, such as cloud computing, to purchase, lease, or rent information technology and to operate that information technology when in its opinion such operation will provide maximum efficiency and economy in the functions of any such agency or agencies. (l)  Upon the request of the governing body of a political subdivision or instrumentality, the authority shall assist the political subdivision or instrumentality in its development of plans for the efficient acquisition and utilization of information technology.  An appropriate fee shall be charged the political subdivision by the authority for such assistance. (m)  The authority shall adopt rules and regulations governing the protest procedures to be followed by any actual or prospective bidder, offerer or contractor who is aggrieved in connection with the solicitation or award of a contract for the acquisition of information technology.  Such rules and regulations shall prescribe the manner, time and procedure for making protests and may provide that a protest not timely filed shall be summarily denied.  The authority may require the protesting party, at the time of filing the protest, to post a bond, payable to the state, in an amount that the authority determines sufficient to cover any expense or loss incurred by the state; however, in no event may the amount of the bond required exceed a reasonable estimate of the total project cost.  The authority, in its discretion, also may prohibit any prospective bidder, offerer or contractor who is a party to any protest or litigation involving any such contract with the state, the authority or any agency of the state to participate in any other such bid, offer or contract, or to be awarded any such contract, during the pendency of the protest or litigation. (n)  The authority shall make a report in writing to the Legislature each year in the month of January.  Such report shall contain a full and detailed account of the work of the authority for the preceding year as specified in Section 25-53-29(3). All acquisitions of information technology involving the expenditure of funds in excess of the dollar amount established in Section 31-7-13(c), or rentals or leases in excess of the dollar amount established in Section 31-7-13(c) for the term of the contract, shall be based upon bid.  The authority may reserve the right to reject any or all bids, and if all bids are rejected, the authority may negotiate a contract within the limitations of the specifications so long as the terms of any such negotiated contract are equal to or better than the lowest bidder, and so long as the total cost to the State of Mississippi does not exceed the lowest bid.  If the authority accepts one (1) of such bids, it shall be that which is the lowest and best.  The provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to acquisitions of information technology equipment and services made by the Mississippi Department of Health and the Mississippi Department of Revenue for the purposes of implementing, administering and enforcing the provisions of the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act by June 30, 2024. (o)  When applicable, the authority may procure information technology in accordance with the law or regulations, or both, which govern the Bureau of Purchasing of the Office of General Services or which govern the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services procurement of information technology. (p)  The authority is authorized to purchase, lease, or rent information technology for the purpose of establishing pilot projects to investigate emerging technologies.  These acquisitions shall be limited to new technologies and shall be limited to an amount set by annual appropriation of the Legislature.  These acquisitions shall be exempt from the advertising and bidding requirement. (q)  To promote the maximum use and benefit from technology and services now in operation or which will in the future be placed in operation and to identify opportunities, minimize duplication, reduce costs and improve the efficiency of providing common technology services the authority is authorized to: (i)  Enter into master agreements for information technology, including cloud computing, available for shared use by state agencies, institutions of higher learning and governing authorities; and (ii)  Enter into contracts for the acquisition of information technology, including cloud computing, that have been acquired by other entities, located within or outside of the State of Mississippi, so long as it is determined by the authority to be in the best interest of the state.  The acquisitions provided in this paragraph (q) shall be exempt from the advertising and bidding requirements of Sections 25-53-1 et seq. and 31-7-1 et seq. (r)  All fees collected by the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services shall be deposited into the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services Revolving Fund unless otherwise specified by the Legislature. (s)  The authority shall work closely with the council to bring about effective coordination of policies, standards and procedures relating to procurement of remote sensing and geographic information systems (GIS) resources. (t)  The authority shall manage one or more State Data Centers to provide information technology services on a cost-sharing basis.  In determining the appropriate services to be provided through the State Data Center, the authority should consider those services that: (i)  Result in savings to the state as a whole; (ii)  Improve and enhance the security and reliability of the state's information and business systems; and (iii)  Optimize the efficient use of the state's information technology assets, including, but not limited to, promoting partnerships with the state institutions of higher learning and community colleges to capitalize on advanced information technology resources. (u)  The authority shall oversee the Mississippi Statewide Data Exchange, ensuring compliance with the requirements of Section 25-53-281.  The Department of Information Technology Services shall have the authority to promulgate rules and regulations necessary to develop, implement and oversee the Mississippi Statewide Data Exchange.  The department shall engage with state agencies and other stakeholders to identify data-sharing opportunities and address potential barriers.  Additionally, the department shall establish a Chief Information Officer (CIO) Council, composed of information technology leadership from state agencies, to provide strategic oversight, promote interoperability and recommend policies to enhance the effectiveness and security of statewide data-sharing initiatives. (v)  The authority shall increase federal participation in the cost of the State Data Center to the extent provided by law and its shared technology infrastructure through providing such shared services to agencies that receive federal funds.  With regard to state institutions of higher learning and community colleges, the authority may provide shared services when mutually agreeable, following a determination by both the authority and the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning or the Mississippi Community College Board, as the case may be, that the sharing of services is mutually beneficial. (w)  The authority, in its discretion, may require new or replacement agency business applications to be hosted at the State Data Center.  With regard to state institutions of higher learning and community colleges, the authority and the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning or the Mississippi Community College Board, as the case may be, may agree that institutions of higher learning or community colleges may utilize business applications that are hosted at the State Data Center, following a determination by both the authority and the applicable board that the hosting of those applications is mutually beneficial.  In addition, the authority may establish partnerships to capitalize on the advanced technology resources of the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning or the Mississippi Community College Board, following a determination by both the authority and the applicable board that such a partnership is mutually beneficial. (x)  The authority shall provide a periodic update regarding reform-based information technology initiatives to the Chairmen of the House and Senate Accountability, Efficiency and Transparency Committees. (y)  The authority shall establish security standards for electronic payments as established in Section 27-104-33 and review the compliance of all state agencies using electronic payments.  The authority shall enforce security compliance by state agencies and contracted third parties and shall notify the Department of Finance and Administration of any security risks. From and after July 1, 2018, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund.  In addition, in order to receive the maximum use and benefit from information technology and services, expenses for the provision of statewide shared services that facilitate cost-effective information technology shall be defrayed by pass-through funding and shall be deposited into the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services Revolving Fund unless otherwise specified by the Legislature.  These funds shall only be utilized to pay the actual costs incurred by the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services for providing these shared services to state agencies. Furthermore, state agencies shall work in full cooperation with the Board of the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services to identify information technology to minimize duplication, reduce costs, and improve the efficiency of providing common technology services across agency boundaries. SECTION 3.  The following shall be codified as Section 25-53-125.1, Mississippi Code of 1972: 25-53-125.1.  (1) The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services shall carry out the following functions supplemental to its responsibilities relative to the procurement of cellular services. (2)  The department shall require that each state agency submit the following information to the department by September 30, 2026: (a)  An acknowledgement that each agency has reviewed its usage and cost information received from its vendor through the vendor's portal; (b)  A signed statement from the agency's executive director asserting that the agency has re-solicited for cellular services and is either: (i)  Currently using the best priced plan that matches current levels of usage and needs; or (ii)  Has converted to best priced cellular service plan that better matches usage and needs; (c)  The annual costs savings of any adjustments to the agency cellular services plans as a result of this effort. (3)  The department shall prepare a report on the information received from agencies under subsection (2) of this section and present this report to the committee chairs of the House and Senate Accountability, Efficiency and Transparency Committees no later than December 31, 2026. SECTION 4.  Section 27-65-33, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-65-33.  (1)  (a)  Except as otherwise provided in this section, the taxes levied by this chapter shall be due and payable on or before the twentieth day of the month next succeeding the month in which the tax accrues, except as otherwise provided.  Returns and payments placed in the mail must be postmarked by the due date in order to be considered timely filed, except when the due date falls on a weekend or holiday, returns and payments placed in the mail must be postmarked by the first working day following the due date in order to be considered timely filed.  The taxpayer shall make a return showing the gross proceeds of sales or the gross income of the business, and any and all allowable deductions, or exempt sales, and compute the tax due for the period covered. * * *  (b)  As compensation for collecting sales and use taxes, complying fully with the applicable statutes, filing returns and supplements thereto and paying all taxes by the twentieth of the month following the period covered, the taxpayer may discount and retain two percent (2%) of the liability on each return subject to the following limitations: (i) The compensation or discount shall not apply to taxes levied under the provisions of Sections 27‑65‑19 and 27‑65‑21, or on charges for ginning cotton under Section 27‑65‑23. (ii) The compensation or discount shall not apply to taxes collected by a county official or state agency. (iii) The compensation or discount shall not exceed Fifty Dollars ($50.00) per month, or Six Hundred Dollars ($600.00) per calendar year, per business location on each state sales tax return, or on each use tax return. (iv) The compensation or discount shall not apply to any wholesale tax, the rate of which is equal to or greater than the tax rate applicable to retail sales of the same property or service.  The retailer of such items shall be entitled to the compensation based on the tax computed on retail sales before application of the credit for any tax paid to the wholesaler, jobber or other person. (v) The compensation or discount allowed and taken for any filing period may be reassessed and collected when an audit of a taxpayer's records reveals a tax deficiency for that period. ( * * *cb)  As compensation for collecting any tax imposed under the authority of a local and private law of the State of Mississippi which is collected and paid to the Department of Revenue in the same or similar manner that state sales taxes are collected and paid, complying fully with such applicable law,  filing returns and supplements thereto and paying all taxes by the twentieth of the month following the period covered, the taxpayer may discount and retain two percent (2%) of the liability on each return subject to the following limitations: (i)  The compensation or discount shall not apply to taxes collected by a county official or state agency. (ii)  The compensation or discount shall not exceed Fifty Dollars ($50.00) per month, or Six Hundred Dollars ($600.00) per calendar year, per business location on each tax return. (iii)  The compensation or discount allowed and taken for any filing period may be reassessed and collected when an audit of a taxpayer's records reveals a tax deficiency for that period. (2)  All returns shall be sworn to by the taxpayer, if made by an individual, or by the president, vice president, secretary or treasurer of a corporation, or authorized agent, if made on behalf of a corporation.  If made on behalf of a partnership, joint venture, association, trust, estate, or in any other group or combination acting as a unit, any individual delegated by such firm shall swear to the return on behalf of the taxpayer.  The commissioner may prescribe methods by which the taxpayer may swear to his return. (3)  The commissioner may promulgate rules and regulations to require or permit filing periods of any duration, in lieu of monthly filing periods, for any taxpayer or group thereof. (4)  The commissioner may require the execution and filing by the taxpayer with the commissioner of a good and solvent bond with some surety company authorized to do business in Mississippi as surety thereon in an amount double the aggregate tax liability by such taxpayer for any previous three-month period within the last calendar year or estimated three (3) months' tax liability.  The bond is to be conditioned for the prompt payment of such taxes as may be due for each such return. (5)  The commissioner, for good cause, may grant such reasonable additional time within which to make any return required under the provisions of this chapter as he may deem proper, but the time for filing any return shall not be extended beyond the twentieth of the month next succeeding the regular due date of the return without the imposition of interest at the rate of one-half of one percent (1/2 of 1%) per month or fractional part of a month from the time the return was due until the tax is paid. (6)  For persistent, willful or recurring failure to make any return and pay the tax shown thereby to be due by the time specified, there shall be added to the amount of tax shown to be due ten percent (10%) damages, or interest at the rate of one-half of one percent (1/2 of 1%) per month, or both. (7)  Any taxpayer may, upon making application therefor, obtain from the commissioner an extension of time for the payment of taxes due on credit sales until collections thereon have been made.  When such extension is granted, the taxpayer shall thereafter include in each monthly or quarterly report all collections made during the preceding month or quarter, and shall pay the taxes due thereon at the time of filing such report.  Such permission may be revoked or denied at the discretion of the commissioner when, in his opinion, a total sales basis will best reflect the taxable income or expedite examination of the taxpayer's records. (8)  Any taxpayer reporting credit sales before collection thereof has been made may take credit on subsequent returns or reports for bad debts actually charged off, if such amounts charged off have previously been included in taxable gross income or taxable gross proceeds of sales, as the case may be, and the tax paid thereon. However, any amounts subsequently collected on accounts that have been charged off as bad debts shall be included in subsequent reports and the tax shall be paid thereon. (9)  In cases where an extension of time has been granted by the commissioner for payment of taxes due on credit sales and the taxpayer thereafter discontinues the business, such taxpayer shall be required to file with the commissioner within ten (10) days, or such further time as the commissioner may direct, from the date of the discontinuance of such business, a special report showing the amounts of any credit sales which have not been included in determining the measure of the tax previously paid and any other information with reference to credit sales as the commissioner may require.  The commissioner shall thereupon investigate the facts with reference to credit sales and the condition of the accounts, and shall determine, from the best evidence available, the value of all open accounts, notes or other evidence of debt arising from credit sales.  The value of all notes, open accounts and other evidence of debt, as thus determined by the commissioner, shall be used in determining the amount of the tax for which such taxpayer shall be liable.  When the amount of the tax shall have been ascertained, the taxpayer shall be required to pay the same within ten (10) days or such further time as the commissioner may allow, notwithstanding the fact that such note or accounts may still remain uncollected. SECTION 5.  Section 27-104-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-104-7.  (1) (a)  There is created the Public Procurement Review Board, which shall be reconstituted on January 1, 2018, and shall be composed of the following members: (i)  Three (3) individuals appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate; (ii)  Two (2) individuals appointed by the Lieutenant Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate; and (iii)  The Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration, serving as an ex officio and nonvoting member. (b)  The initial terms of each appointee shall be as follows: (i)  One (1) member appointed by the Governor to serve for a term ending on June 30, 2019; (ii)  One (1) member appointed by the Governor to serve for a term ending on June 30, 2020; (iii)  One (1) member appointed by the Governor to serve for a term ending on June 30, 2021; (iv)  One (1) member appointed by the Lieutenant Governor to serve for a term ending on June 30, 2019; and (v)  One (1) member appointed by the Lieutenant Governor to serve for a term ending on June 30, 2020. After the expiration of the initial terms, all appointed members' terms shall be for a period of four (4) years from the expiration date of the previous term, and until such time as the member's successor is duly appointed and qualified. (c)  When appointing members to the Public Procurement Review Board, the Governor and Lieutenant Governor shall take into consideration persons who possess at least five (5) years of management experience in general business, health care or finance for an organization, corporation or other public or private entity.  Any person, or any employee or owner of a company, who receives any grants, procurements or contracts that are subject to approval under this section shall not be appointed to the Public Procurement Review Board.  Any person, or any employee or owner of a company, who is a principal of the source providing a personal or professional service shall not be appointed to the Public Procurement Review Board if the principal owns or controls a greater than five percent (5%) interest or has an ownership value of One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) in the source's business, whichever is smaller.  No member shall be an officer or employee of the State of Mississippi while serving as a voting member on the Public Procurement Review Board. (d)  Members of the Public Procurement Review Board shall be entitled to per diem as authorized by Section 25-3-69 and travel reimbursement as authorized by Section 25-3-41. (e)  The members of the Public Procurement Review Board shall elect a chair from among the membership, and he or she shall preside over the meetings of the board.  The board shall annually elect a vice chair, who shall serve in the absence of the chair.  No business shall be transacted, including adoption of rules of procedure, without the presence of a quorum of the board.  Three (3) members shall be a quorum. No action shall be valid unless approved by a majority of the members present and voting, entered upon the minutes of the board and signed by the chair. Necessary clerical and administrative support for the board shall be provided by the Department of Finance and Administration.  Minutes shall be kept of the proceedings of each meeting, copies of which shall be filed on a monthly basis with the chairs of the Accountability, Efficiency and Transparency Committees of the Senate and House of Representatives and the chairs of the Appropriations Committees of the Senate and House of Representatives. (2)  The Public Procurement Review Board shall have the following powers and responsibilities: (a)  Approve all purchasing regulations governing the purchase or lease by any agency, as defined in Section 31-7-1, of commodities and equipment, except computer equipment acquired pursuant to Sections 25-53-1 through 25-53-29; (b)  Adopt regulations governing the approval of contracts let for the construction and maintenance of state buildings and other state facilities as well as related contracts for architectural and engineering services. The provisions of this paragraph (b) shall not apply to such contracts involving buildings and other facilities of state institutions of higher learning which are self-administered as provided under this paragraph (b) or Section 37-101-15(m); (c)  Adopt regulations governing any lease or rental agreement by any state agency or department, including any state agency financed entirely by federal funds, for space outside the buildings under the jurisdiction of the Department of Finance and Administration.  These regulations shall require each agency requesting to lease such space to provide the following information that shall be published by the Department of Finance and Administration on its website:  the agency to lease the space; the terms of the lease; the approximate square feet to be leased; the use for the space; a description of a suitable space; the general location desired for the leased space; the contact information for a person from the agency; the deadline date for the agency to have received a lease proposal; any other specific terms or conditions of the agency; and any other information deemed appropriate by the Division of Real Property Management of the Department of Finance and Administration or the Public Procurement Review Board.  The information shall be provided sufficiently in advance of the time the space is needed to allow the Division of Real Property Management of the Department of Finance and Administration to review and preapprove the lease before the time for advertisement begins; (d)  Adopt, in its discretion, regulations to set aside at least five percent (5%) of anticipated annual expenditures for the purchase of commodities from minority businesses; however, all such set-aside purchases shall comply with all purchasing regulations promulgated by the department and shall be subject to all bid requirements.  Set-aside purchases for which competitive bids are required shall be made from the lowest and best minority business bidder; however, if no minority bid is available or if the minority bid is more than two percent (2%) higher than the lowest bid, then bids shall be accepted and awarded to the lowest and best bidder.  However, the provisions in this paragraph shall not be construed to prohibit the rejection of a bid when only one (1) bid is received.  Such rejection shall be placed in the minutes.  For the purposes of this paragraph, the term "minority business" means a business which is owned by a person who is a citizen or lawful permanent resident of the United States and who is: (i)  Black:  having origins in any of the black racial groups of Africa; (ii)  Hispanic:  of Mexican, Puerto Rican, Cuban, Central or South American, or other Spanish or Portuguese culture or origin regardless of race; (iii)  Asian-American: having origins in any of the original people of the Far East, Southeast Asia, the Indian subcontinent, or the Pacific Islands; (iv)  American Indian or Alaskan Native:  having origins in any of the original people of North America; or (v)  Female; (e)  In consultation with and approval by the Chairs of the Senate and House Public Property Committees, approve leases, for a term not to exceed eighteen (18) months, entered into by state agencies for the purpose of providing parking arrangements for state employees who work in the Woolfolk Building, the Carroll Gartin Justice Building or the Walter Sillers Office Building; (f)  (i)  Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, promulgate rules and regulations governing the solicitation and selection of contractual services personnel, including personal and professional services contracts for any form of consulting, policy analysis, public relations, marketing, public affairs, legislative advocacy services or any other contract that the board deems appropriate for oversight, with the exception of: 1.  Any personal service contracts entered into by any agency that employs only nonstate service employees as defined in Section 25-9-107(c); 2.  Any personal service contracts entered into for computer or information technology-related services governed by the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services; 3.  Any personal service contracts entered into by the individual state institutions of higher learning; 4.  Any personal service contracts entered into by the Mississippi Department of Transportation; 5.  Any personal service contracts entered into by the Department of Human Services through June 30, 2019, which the Executive Director of the Department of Human Services determines would be useful in establishing and operating the Department of Child Protection Services; 6.  Any personal service contracts entered into by the Department of Child Protection Services through June 30, 2019; 7.  Any contracts for entertainers and/or performers at the Mississippi State Fairgrounds entered into by the Mississippi Fair Commission; 8.  Any contracts entered into by the Department of Finance and Administration when procuring aircraft maintenance, parts, equipment and/or services; 9.  Any contract entered into by the Department of Public Safety for service on specialized equipment and/or software required for the operation of such specialized equipment for use by the Office of Forensics Laboratories; 10.  Any personal or professional service contract entered into by the Mississippi Department of Health or the Department of Revenue solely in connection with their respective responsibilities under the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act from February 2, 2022, through June 30, 2026; 11.  Any contract for attorney, accountant, actuary auditor, architect, engineer, anatomical pathologist, or utility rate expert services; 12.  Any personal service contracts approved by the Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration and entered into by the Coordinator of Mental Health Accessibility through June 30, 2022; 13.  Any personal or professional services contract entered into by the State Department of Health in carrying out its responsibilities under the ARPA Rural Water Associations Infrastructure Grant Program through June 30, 2026; 14.  And any personal or professional services contract entered into by the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality in carrying out its responsibilities under the Mississippi Municipality and County Water Infrastructure Grant Program Act of 2022, through June 30, 2026; 15.  Any personal or professional services contract entered into by an agency for the design, operation or maintenance of museum exhibits.  An agency making a purchase under this exemption shall publicly advertise a Request for Qualifications but shall be otherwise exempt.  Any contracts arising from the use of this exemption must be approved by the Public Procurement Review Board prior to execution by the agency; 16.  Any personal or professional services contract entered into by the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality in carrying out its responsibilities under Section 49-2-13(l). This item 16 shall stand repealed on July 1, 2028; and 17.  Any contract entered into by the State Department of Health for service on specialized equipment and/or software required for the operation of such specialized equipment for the use by the Public Health Laboratory. Any such rules and regulations shall provide for maintaining continuous internal audit covering the activities of such agency affecting its revenue and expenditures as required under Section 7-7-3(6)(d).  Any rules and regulation changes related to personal and professional services contracts that the Public Procurement Review Board may propose shall be submitted to the Chairs of the Accountability, Efficiency and Transparency Committees of the Senate and House of Representatives and the Chairs of the Appropriation Committees of the Senate and House of Representatives at least fifteen (15) days before the board votes on the proposed changes, and those rules and regulation changes, if adopted, shall be promulgated in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Act. (ii)  From and after July 1, 2024, the Public Procurement Review Board shall promulgate rules and regulations that require the Department of Finance and Administration to conduct personal and professional services solicitations as provided in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph for those services in excess of Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00) for the Department of Marine Resources, the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency and the Mississippi Development Authority, with assistance to be provided from these entities.  Any powers that have been conferred upon agencies in order to comply with the provisions of this section for personal and professional services solicitations shall be conferred upon the Department of Finance and Administration to conduct personal and professional services solicitations for the Department of Marine Resources, the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency and the Mississippi Development Authority for those services in excess of Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00).  The Department of Finance and Administration shall make any submissions that are required to be made by other agencies to the Public Procurement Review Board for the Department of Marine Resources, the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency and the Mississippi Development Authority. The provisions of this subparagraph (ii) shall stand repealed on June 30, 2027; (g)  Approve all personal and professional services contracts involving the expenditures of funds in excess of Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00), except as provided in paragraph (f) of this subsection (2) and in subsection (8); (h)  Develop mandatory standards with respect to contractual services personnel that require invitations for public bid, requests for proposals, record keeping and financial responsibility of contractors.  The Public Procurement Review Board shall, unless exempted under this paragraph (h) or under paragraph (i) or (o) of this subsection (2), require the agency involved to submit the procurement to a competitive procurement process, and may reserve the right to reject any or all resulting procurements; (i)  Prescribe certain circumstances by which agency heads may enter into contracts for personal and professional services without receiving prior approval from the Public Procurement Review Board.  The Public Procurement Review Board may establish a preapproved list of providers of various personal and professional services for set prices with which state agencies may contract without bidding or prior approval from the board; (i)  Agency requirements may be fulfilled by procuring services performed incident to the state's own programs.  The agency head shall determine in writing whether the price represents a fair market value for the services.  When the procurements are made from other governmental entities, the private sector need not be solicited; however, these contracts shall still be submitted for approval to the Public Procurement Review Board. (ii)  Contracts between two (2) state agencies, both under Public Procurement Review Board purview, shall not require Public Procurement Review Board approval.  However, the contracts shall still be entered into the enterprise resource planning system; (j)  Provide standards for the issuance of requests for proposals, the evaluation of proposals received, consideration of costs and quality of services proposed, contract negotiations, the administrative monitoring of contract performance by the agency and successful steps in terminating a contract; (k)  Present recommendations for governmental privatization and to evaluate privatization proposals submitted by any state agency; (l)  Authorize personal and professional service contracts to be effective for more than one (1) year provided a funding condition is included in any such multiple year contract, except the State Board of Education, which shall have the authority to enter into contractual agreements for student assessment for a period up to ten (10) years.  The State Board of Education shall procure these services in accordance with the Public Procurement Review Board procurement regulations; (m)  Request the State Auditor to conduct a performance audit on any personal or professional service contract; (n)  Prepare an annual report to the Legislature concerning the issuance of personal and professional services contracts during the previous year, collecting any necessary information from state agencies in making such report; (o)  Develop and implement the following standards and procedures for the approval of any sole source contract for personal and professional services regardless of the value of the procurement: (i)  For the purposes of this paragraph (o), the term "sole source" means only one (1) source is available that can provide the required personal or professional service. (ii)  An agency that has been issued a binding, valid court order mandating that a particular source or provider must be used for the required service must include a copy of the applicable court order in all future sole source contract reviews for the particular personal or professional service referenced in the court order. (iii)  Any agency alleging to have a sole source for any personal or professional service, other than those exempted under paragraph (f) of this subsection (2) and subsection (8), shall publish on the procurement portal website established by Sections 25-53-151 and 27-104-165, for at least fourteen (14) days, the terms of the proposed contract for those services.  In addition, the publication shall include, but is not limited to, the following information: 1.  The personal or professional service offered in the contract; 2.  An explanation of why the personal or professional service is the only one that can meet the needs of the agency; 3.  An explanation of why the source is the only person or entity that can provide the required personal or professional service; 4.  An explanation of why the amount to be expended for the personal or professional service is reasonable; and 5.  The efforts that the agency went through to obtain the best possible price for the personal or professional service. (iv)  If any person or entity objects and proposes that the personal or professional service published under subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph (o) is not a sole source service and can be provided by another person or entity, then the objecting person or entity shall notify the Public Procurement Review Board and the agency that published the proposed sole source contract with a detailed explanation of why the personal or professional service is not a sole source service. (v)  1.  If the agency determines after review that the personal or professional service in the proposed sole source contract can be provided by another person or entity, then the agency must withdraw the sole source contract publication from the procurement portal website and submit the procurement of the personal or professional service to an advertised competitive bid or selection process. 2.  If the agency determines after review that there is only one (1) source for the required personal or professional service, then the agency may appeal to the Public Procurement Review Board.  The agency has the burden of proving that the personal or professional service is only provided by one (1) source. 3.  If the Public Procurement Review Board has any reasonable doubt as to whether the personal or professional service can only be provided by one (1) source, then the agency must submit the procurement of the personal or professional service to an advertised competitive bid or selection process.  No action taken by the Public Procurement Review Board in this appeal process shall be valid unless approved by a majority of the members of the Public Procurement Review Board present and voting. (vi)  The Public Procurement Review Board shall prepare and submit a quarterly report to the House of Representatives and Senate Accountability, Efficiency and Transparency Committees that details the sole source contracts presented to the Public Procurement Review Board and the reasons that the Public Procurement Review Board approved or rejected each contract.  These quarterly reports shall also include the documentation and memoranda required in subsection (4) of this section.  An agency that submitted a sole source contract shall be prepared to explain the sole source contract to each committee by December 15 of each year upon request by the committee; (p)  Assess any fines and administrative penalties provided for in Sections 31-7-401 through 31-7-423 * * *.; (q)  To administer a shared office space and shared services program for office space leasing as provided in Section 7 of this act. (3)  All submissions shall be made sufficiently in advance of each monthly meeting of the Public Procurement Review Board as prescribed by the Public Procurement Review Board.  If the Public Procurement Review Board rejects any contract submitted for review or approval, the Public Procurement Review Board shall clearly set out the reasons for its action, including, but not limited to, the policy that the agency has violated in its submitted contract and any corrective actions that the agency may take to amend the contract to comply with the rules and regulations of the Public Procurement Review Board. (4)  All sole source contracts for personal and professional services awarded by state agencies, other than those exempted under Section 27-104-7(2)(f) and (8), whether approved by an agency head or the Public Procurement Review Board, shall contain in the procurement file a written determination for the approval, using a request form furnished by the Public Procurement Review Board.  The written determination shall document the basis for the determination, including any market analysis conducted in order to ensure that the service required was practicably available from only one (1) source.  A memorandum shall accompany the request form and address the following four (4) points: (a)  Explanation of why this service is the only service that can meet the needs of the purchasing agency; (b)  Explanation of why this vendor is the only practicably available source from which to obtain this service; (c)  Explanation of why the price is considered reasonable; and (d)  Description of the efforts that were made to conduct a noncompetitive negotiation to get the best possible price for the taxpayers. (5)  In conjunction with the State Personnel Board, the Public Procurement Review Board shall develop and promulgate rules and regulations to define the allowable legal relationship between contract employees and the contracting departments, agencies and institutions of state government under the jurisdiction of the State Personnel Board, in compliance with the applicable rules and regulations of the federal Internal Revenue Service (IRS) for federal employment tax purposes.  Under these regulations, the usual common law rules are applicable to determine and require that such worker is an independent contractor and not an employee, requiring evidence of lawful behavioral control, lawful financial control and lawful relationship of the parties.  Any state department, agency or institution shall only be authorized to contract for personnel services in compliance with those regulations. (6)  No member of the Public Procurement Review Board shall use his or her official authority or influence to coerce, by threat of discharge from employment, or otherwise, the purchase of commodities, the contracting for personal or professional services, or the contracting for public construction under this chapter. (7)  Notwithstanding any other laws or rules to the contrary, the provisions of subsection (2) of this section shall not be applicable to the Mississippi State Port Authority at Gulfport. (8)  Nothing in this section shall impair or limit the authority of the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees' Retirement System to enter into any personal or professional services contracts directly related to their constitutional obligation to manage the trust funds, including, but not limited to, actuarial, custodial banks, cash management, investment consultant and investment management contracts.  Nothing in this section shall impair or limit the authority of the State Treasurer to enter into any personal or professional services contracts involving the management of trust funds, including, but not limited to, actuarial, custodial banks, cash management, investment consultant and investment management contracts. (9)  Through December 31, 2026, the provisions of this section related to rental agreements or leasing of real property for the purpose of conducting agency business shall not apply to the Office of Workforce Development created in Section 37-153-7. SECTION 6.  Section 27-104-33, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-104-33.  The State Department of Finance and Administration shall establish policies that allow the payment of various fees and other accounts receivable to state agencies, and the payment for retail merchandise sold by state agencies, by credit cards, charge cards, debit cards and other forms of electronic payment in the discretion of the department.  Any fees or charges associated with the use of such electronic payments shall be assessed to the user of the electronic payment as an additional charge for processing the electronic payment, so that the user will pay the full cost of using the electronic payment. Agencies, with the approval of the Department of Finance and Administration, may bear the full cost of processing such electronic payments if the agency can demonstrate to the department's satisfaction that they are able to assume these costs and provide the related service for the same or lesser cost.  However, state agencies may bear the full cost of processing such electronic payments for retail merchandise sold by state agencies. The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services shall cooperate with the Department of Finance and Administration in reviewing the security components of any and all electronic payment agreements and notify the Department of Finance and Administration of any security risks.  The Department of Information Technology Services shall enforce compliance in any breach of security standards. SECTION 7.  Section 29-5-2, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 29-5-2.  The duties of the Department of Finance and Administration shall be as follows: (a)  (i)  To exercise general supervision and care over and keep in good condition the following state property located in the City of Jackson:  the New State Capitol Building, the Woolfolk State Office Building and Parking Garage, the Carroll Gartin Justice Building, the Walter Sillers Office Building and Parking Garage, the War Veterans' Memorial Building, the Charlotte Capers Building, the William F. Winter Archives and History Building, the Mississippi Museum Complex, the Gulf, Mobile and Ohio Train Depot (GM&O Depot), the Old State Capitol Building, the Governor's Mansion, the Heber Ladner Building, the Robert E. Lee Office Building, the Robert E. Lee Parking Garage, the former Naval Reserve Center, 515 East Amite Street, 620 North Street, 660 North Street, 700 North State Street, 350 High Street, 401 North Lamar Street, 455 North Lamar Street, the State Records Center, the Robert G. Clark, Jr. Building, the Mississippi State Fairgrounds Complex, the former Central High Building, the Mississippi Workers' Compensation Commission Office Building, as well as all state-owned or leased buildings situated on seat of government property. (ii)  To exercise general supervision and care over and keep in good condition the Dr. Eldon Langston Bolton Building located in Biloxi, Mississippi. (iii)  To exercise general supervision and care over and keep in good condition the State Service Center, located at the intersection of U.S. Highway 49 and John Merl Tatum Industrial Drive in Hattiesburg, Mississippi. (iv)  To exercise general supervision and care over and keep in good condition any property purchased, constructed or otherwise acquired by the State of Mississippi for conducting state business and not specifically under the supervision and care by any other state entity, but which is reasonably assumed the department would be responsible for such, as approved by the Public Procurement Review Board, including, but not limited to: 1.  The National Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA) Shared Services Center and Lockheed Martin Building at Stennis Space Center; 2.  The Mississippi Sports Hall of Fame; 3.  The Mississippi Crafts Center; 4.  The Mississippi Children's Museum; and 5.  The Mississippi Arts and Entertainment Center. (b)  To assign suitable office space for the various state departments, officers and employees who are provided with an office in any of the buildings under the jurisdiction or control of the Department of Finance and Administration.  However, the assignment of space in the New Capitol Building shall be designated by duly passed resolution of the combined Senate Rules Committee and the House Management Committee, meeting as a joint committee, approved by the Lieutenant Governor and Speaker of the House of Representatives.  A majority vote of the members of the Senate Rules Committee and a majority vote of the members of the House Management Committee shall be required on all actions taken, resolutions or reports adopted, and all other matters considered by the full combined committee on occasions when the Senate Rules Committee and the House Management Committee shall meet as a full combined committee. (c)  To approve or disapprove with the concurrence of the Public Procurement Review Board, any lease or rental agreements by any state agency or department, including any state agency financed entirely by federal and special funds, for space outside the buildings under the jurisdiction of the Department of Finance and Administration, including space necessary for parking to be used by state employees who work in the Woolfolk Building, the Carroll Gartin Justice Building or the Walter Sillers Office Building.  In no event shall any employee, officer, department, federally funded agency or bureau of the state be authorized to enter into a lease or rental agreement without prior approval of the Department of Finance and Administration and the Public Procurement Review Board. The Department of Finance and Administration is authorized to use architects, engineers, building inspectors and other personnel for the purpose of making inspections as may be deemed necessary in carrying out its duties and maintaining the facilities. This section is not intended to apply to locations for which the Department of Finance and Administration has decided to solicit proposals in accordance with subsection (e) of this section. (d)  To acquire by lease, lease-purchase agreement, or otherwise, as provided in Section 27-104-107, and to assign through the Office of General Services, by lease or sublease agreement from the office, and with the concurrence of the Public Procurement Review Board, to any state agency or department, including any state agency financed entirely by federal and special funds, appropriate office space in the buildings acquired. (e)  To solicit and approve or disapprove, notwithstanding any rule of law to the contrary, and with the concurrence of the Public Procurement Review Board, any lease, use or rental agreement for a charge or other consideration for space not exceeding three thousand (3,000) square feet in any individual building listed in subsection (a) of this section, with a private entry who will provide food and/or catering services for state employees, visitors and the general public. The department shall select the entity using a competitive process which shall be publicly advertised.  In addition to satisfying any other requirements for the Public Procurement Review Board's approval, the department must demonstrate that any agreement entered into under this section will neither result in a net cost to the state, nor impair or impede the function of state agencies at such location. (f)  To implement a shared space and shared services program under which certain agencies are co-located in an office space located in the Central Business District of Jackson, Mississippi, under the conditions set out in this section.  The goal of this program is to reduce the amount of funds expended annually to lease property from private lessors.  The following agencies shall be participants in this program: (i)  Board of Architecture; (ii)  Board of Contractors; (iii)  Board of Dental Examiners; (iv)  Board of Examiners for Licensed Professional Counselors; (v)  Board of Funeral Service; (vi)  Board of Medical Licensure; (vii)  Board of Nursing; (viii)  Board of Nursing Home Administrators; (ix)  Board of Optometry; (x)  Board of Pharmacy; (xi)  Board of Physical Therapy; (xii)  Board of Public Accountancy; (xiii) Department of Banking and Consumer Finance; (xiv)  Motor Vehicle Commission; (xv)  Oil and Gas Board; (xvi)  Real Estate Commission; and (xvii)  Soil and Water Conservation Commission. Consolidation of office space shall be affected by June 30, 2027, provided that the Department of Finance and Administration determines that office space is available for these agencies at rates which will result in cost savings to the state.  The Department of Finance and Administration may substitute agencies if good cause exists for such substitutions. (g)  The Department of Finance and Administration is authorized to establish a support services division to provide administrative and programmatic support for the agencies using shared space.  Any vacant positions of the agencies listed in paragraph (f) of this section shall be frozen and held vacant from and after the effective date of this act.  The Department of Finance and Administration shall, with assistance of the Mississippi State Personnel Board, identify positions that could be eliminated or used in a shared services division.  The Department of Finance and Administration is authorized to: (i)  Allow for a frozen position to be filled if it determines such is necessary to provide effective program administration; (ii)  Recommend to the Legislature the transfer of positions to the department to manage a support services division rendering services to the enumerated agencies; (iii)  Establish a system by which the agencies participating in the shared services program pay assessment fees to the State General Fund to cover the cost of administering the support services division. SECTION 8.  Section 35-7-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 35-7-7.  The administration of the provisions hereof is vested in a Veterans' Home Purchase Board consisting of six (6) members who shall be appointed, or reappointed, by the Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate.  * * *Members appointed to the board shall be veterans of either World War II, the Korean Conflict, the Southeast Asia Conflict, the Persian Gulf Conflict or have served in active duty for at least one hundred eighty (180) days during a time of war or a conflict in which a campaign ribbon or medal was issued and shall possess a background in business, banking, real estate or the legal profession which enables them to carry out the duties of the board. Two (2) members of the board shall possess at least five (5) years of experience in the mortgage industry that enables them to carry out the duties of the board.  All remaining members appointed to the board shall be veterans of either World War II, the Korean Conflict, the Southeast Asia Conflict, the Persian Gulf Conflict or have served in active duty for at least one hundred eighty (180) days and shall possess a background in business, banking, real estate or the legal profession that enables them to carry out the duties of the board.  No state/department commander of any federally recognized veterans organization, no national officer of any federally recognized veterans organization and no member of the Mississippi Council of Veterans Organizations shall be eligible for appointment to the board until the expiration of a period of three (3) years after the termination of his service in such disqualifying positions.  Appointments shall be staggered, with each Governor appointing or reappointing two (2) members in the first year of his administration, one (1) member in the second year, two (2) members in the third year, and one (1) member in the fourth year.  Appointments for terms that expire in 1988 shall be made as follows:  one (1) shall be made for a term ending on July 1, 1989; one (1) shall be made for a term ending on July 1, 1991; and two (2) shall be made for a term ending on July 1, 1992. Persons appointed to succeed the two (2) members whose terms expired in 1986, or any such member holding over after 1986 because no successor was appointed, shall serve until July 1, 1990.  After the expiration of the foregoing terms, all appointments shall be for a term of four (4) years from the expiration date of the previous term.  From and after July 1, 1988, one (1) appointee shall be selected from each of the five (5) congressional districts of this state as such districts are composed on May 1, 1987, and one (1) appointee shall be selected from the state at large.  Any vacancy occurring during a term shall be filled by appointment of a member for the unexpired portion of the term. The Veterans' Home Purchase Board, created by former Section 35-7-7, is continued and reconstituted as follows: Effective January 1, 2028, one (1) appointed member shall be from each Supreme Court District as they * * * exist at the time of appointment existed on January 1, 2025, and * * * two (2) three (3) from the state at large.  Effective January 1, 2028, the appointed members of the board designated in this section * * *, shall be appointed by the Governor to terms of office of four (4) years, with the advice and consent of the Senate, provided that three (3) such members shall be appointed in 2028 to a term ending December 31, 2031, and three (3) such members shall be appointed in 2030 to a term ending December 31, 2033.  Appointments made at the beginning of the four-year cycle shall be made to fill any member's term which actually expires that year and any member's term which expires next until the majority of the membership of the board or commission is reached.  Appointments made at the beginning of the third year of the four-year cycle shall be made for the remainder of the membership positions irrespective of the time of their prior appointment.  Any question regarding the order of appointments shall be determined by the Secretary of State in accordance with the specific statute. All appointment procedures, vacancy provisions, interim appointment provisions and removal provisions specifically provided for in Section 7-1-35, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be fully applicable to appointments to the Veterans' Home Purchase Board. The board is hereby authorized and empowered to make and promulgate such reasonable rules and regulations under this chapter as it shall deem to be necessary or advisable and to enforce the same.  The board shall have authority to render the final decision on the purchase application process, approval of purchases, funding of purchase commitments, servicing loans and default, property security, management, resale, release from security, and all other matters relating to the purchases and loans made under this law.  The board shall likewise, by an order spread on its minutes, elect a chairman and vice chairman to serve for one-year terms, and all such officers are eligible to succeed themselves in such offices.  The chairman may appoint a three-member loan committee from the membership of the board and shall specify the conditions, responsibilities and authority of such committee. Each member of the board and his successor shall be reimbursed all of his actual and necessary traveling and other expenses incurred in the attendance of the meetings of the board or in the performance of other duties in connection with the business of the board as provided for state officers and employees in Section 25-3-41, and shall be allowed a per diem as provided in Section 25-3-69 for such attendance; provided that the number of days per diem shall not exceed sixty-six (66) days for the chairman and fifty (50) days for other members of the board during any one (1) fiscal year.  The above limitation of days per year shall not apply to board members appointed on a full-time basis to the loan committee. The board is authorized to appoint an executive director for a term of four (4) years, with the advice and consent of the Senate, and consistent with the provisions of Section 7-1-35, Mississippi Code of 1972.  The director, or other executive officer employed by the board, shall execute a surety bond in the sum of One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00), conditioned upon the faithful performance of his duties and upon his accounting for all monies coming into his hands; and each employee handling funds shall execute a like bond in the sum of Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00), and the premiums thereon shall be paid from the funds provided for administering this chapter. The board may designate one (1) of its employees as the acting director or executive officer by a vote of the majority of the members of the board, officially recorded in the minutes of a regular or special meeting, and such acting director shall be vested with all the authority conferred upon the director by the provisions of this chapter. The acting director, when so designated, will be required to furnish surety bond in the same amount and under the same conditions as the director.  The purpose of this provision is to designate an executive officer during any temporary illness, absence or incapacity of the regularly designated director. The board may designate one (1) of its employees by a vote of the majority of the members of the board, officially recorded in the minutes of a regular or special meeting, to be authorized to sign a Deed of Conveyance or other closing documents necessary as to not delay the closing or settlement of a home purchase during the absence or unavailability of the director. The executive director, or the acting director or executive officer if there is no executive director, shall establish, with the assistance of the Mississippi Ethics Commission, an ethics training program to be provided to all new and current board members. The board may select and employ such expert, technical and clerical assistance as in its judgment may be necessary in the proper administration of said board and fix the salaries of such employees. The board is empowered to employ auditors and accountants to examine the books, accounts and records of the board if it so desires, and the board is also authorized to employ legal counsel if it deems such a course necessary in the proper administration of its affairs. SECTION 9.  Section 35-7-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 35-7-25.  (1)  When a veteran has been authorized by the board to select the home he desires, he shall submit his selection in such form as may be prescribed by the board.  If the board is satisfied of the desirability of the property submitted and if such veteran has agreed with the board to actually reside upon such property within sixty (60) days from the date of purchase by the board, and if the price of said property to the board does not exceed the maximum provided in Section 35-7-17, then the board shall be empowered to purchase said property from the owner thereof, including the veteran under the provisions of Section 35-7-17(1), upon such terms as may be by them agreed upon.  The board, in its discretion, is authorized to enter into a contract with the veteran for the sale and to consummate the sale of said property to said veteran.  The board shall fix the selling price of such property by adding to the purchase price of said property or to the value of said property as determined by the board when such property is acquired by the board in a manner other than by purchase, as in foreclosure or repossession, all expenses incurred and estimated to be incurred by the board in relation thereto, inclusive of interest, administration, appraisals, examination of title, incidental expenses and such sum as shall be deemed necessary to meet unforeseen contingencies.  The purchaser shall make an initial payment of at least twenty percent (20%) of the selling price of the property; however, the board may reduce or waive said initial payment for any veteran provided the loan contract is underwritten or guaranteed by the Veterans' Administration in accordance with the terms of the Servicemen's Readjustment Act of 1944, as amended.  The balance of said selling price may be amortized over a period to be fixed by the board, but not exceeding thirty (30) years, together with interest thereon at a rate which shall be fixed by the board, * * *which shall in no case be less than two and one‑half percent (2‑1/2%) per annum, and which shall in no case be higher than the rate of interest authorized and permitted by the Veterans' Administration for loans guaranteed under the provisions of Title III of the Servicemen's Readjustment Act of 1944, as amended. which shall be one percent (1%) to two percent (2%) below market rates at the time the board sets the rates.  The purchaser shall have the right at any time to pay any or all installments still remaining unpaid.  In any individual case, the board may for good cause postpone from time to time, upon such terms as the board may deem proper, the payment of the whole or any part of any installment of the selling price or interest thereon.  The board is empowered in each individual case to specify the terms of the contract entered into with the purchaser, not contrary to the provisions of this chapter. (2)  Before the purchase of any property by the board, there must be filed with said board an appraisement of the fair and reasonable value of such property by a qualified appraiser. Each appraisement shall state, among other things, that it is made in good faith and that the valuation is honestly determined and represents the bona fide opinion of the maker. (3)  The board, before consummating the purchase under the provisions of this section, shall be satisfied that title to the property sought to be purchased is good. SECTION 10.  Section 35-7-45, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 35-7-45.  (a)  Any money previously appropriated to the revolving fund of the board or that may be hereinafter appropriated shall be commingled, exclusive of escrow funds provided for in Section 35-7-31, into a general revolving fund for carrying out the provisions of this chapter.  The expense of administering this chapter shall be paid from the revolving fund within the limitations provided by Section 35-7-9.  The revolving fund of the board will constitute a trust fund and shall be segregated from all other funds in the State Treasury.  All interest earned by the State Treasury on any investment of the Veterans' Home Purchase Board Revolving Fund shall be placed to the credit of such fund.  The State Fiscal Management Board is authorized and directed to draw warrants upon such funds from time to time upon requisition of the board executed by its executive officer, and the State Treasurer is hereby authorized and directed to pay such warrants. (b)  The money repaid by the purchaser shall be deposited in the board's revolving fund and shall be available under the same conditions as the original appropriation.  The board shall have continuing authority to expend funds up to the maximum amount received into the special revolving fund, limited to the discretionary best judgment of the board as to reserve.  The board shall submit to the State Fiscal Management Board, the Legislative Budget Office, legislative appropriation committees, and other such authority as may arise or be deemed necessary, an annual budget, using the standard general fund budget format as a model, but modified to reflect an accurate and management-oriented view of the revolving fund, and an annual report reflecting a detailed analysis of all revenue and expenditures.  All funds in the revolving fund in excess of the * * *one percent (1%) two percent (2%) administrative expense allowance shall be expended or committed for new loans with the exception of the reserve judged necessary by the board. (c)  The board, with the advice and consent of the State Bond Commission, may also sell or hypothecate its mortgage loans to the Reconstruction Finance Corporation of the United States Government or to any subsidiary agency thereof, or to any other agency, private or public, when a sale of such mortgage loans would be to the advantage of the board.  However, no mortgage loans may be sold for less than the prevailing market value, which may include sale at a discount from book value when discounted to present value to equate to market yields, of said loans as determined by the State Bond Commission.  The provisions of this section may also include the discounting to present value of lower interest rate loans to the mortgagor to encourage early payoff of the loan. (d)  The board may issue its notes in such amounts and for such terms as the board may deem advisable to provide additional funds for purchase of veterans' homes, and such notes shall be eligible for purchase by any agency of the State of Mississippi. The repayment of such notes shall be guaranteed by the board, and any and all income to the board from the repayments of the principal and interest on its purchases by veterans shall be first pledged to repayment of any maturing notes.  The maturity dates, denomination or amount, and rate of interest of such notes shall be determined by the board; however, such notes shall in no event exceed a term of thirty (30) years nor bear a higher rate of interest than one percent (1%) below that received by the board on its mortgages and deeds of trust.  Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the board may apply the proceeds from the issuance of its notes under this section or the issuance of its bonds under any other applicable law, as follows: (i)  Refinancing of permanent mortgage loans, subject to the conditions specified in Section 35-7-17(5). (ii)  Increasing the purchase limit on homes as provided in Section 35-7-17(1). The board shall have the authority to sell outright its mortgages and deeds of trust at market value, or discounted to present value, as hereinabove provided and to service said mortgages for the purchaser, collecting the principal and interest due the owner of such mortgages, and to charge therefor a reasonable service fee to be mutually agreed upon by the purchaser of such mortgages and the board. Any notes issued by the board must be approved at a regular meeting of the board, upon favorable vote by a majority of four (4) members of the board, who shall authorize the chairman and the executive director of said board to issue and sign such notes as the official deed and act of the whole board. (e)  Any additional monies appropriated or obtained to extend the benefits of this chapter shall be commingled with and become an integral part of the revolving fund provided by this section, and the method of accounting therefor shall be the same as used with respect to any other monies in the revolving fund. SECTION 11. (1)  The committee shall be responsible for carrying out certain specific responsibilities related to the evaluation of education programs in the public schools of the state.  The committee shall: (a)  Prepare a list of all efficiency measures that the committee's designated contractor has recommended for use by local school districts that are being used by districts to measure their efficiency; and (b)  Summarize actions school districts have taken to reduce costs and improve efficiency based on the recommendations made by the committee's designated contractor. (2)  By December 31, 2026, the committee shall compile a report on school district cost savings to be made available to the Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the committee chairs of the House and Senate Education committees. (3)  This section shall stand repealed from and after January 1, 2027. SECTION 12. Section 11 of this act shall be codified in Chapter 3, Title 5, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 13.  Section 37-3-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-3-5.  (1)  The State Department of Education is * * *hereby charged with the execution of all laws relating to the administrative, supervisory and consultative services to the public schools and agricultural high schools of the school districts throughout the State of Mississippi.  The State Department of Education is also authorized to grant property to public school districts and agricultural high schools of the State of Mississippi. (a)  The department shall aid school districts in creating technology and disaster recovery plans. The department shall develop a plan template and provide guidance documents for technology staff to use when developing these plans. (b)  In order for the department to better understand the resources and support needed to assist districts in improving their technology programs, the department shall conduct the following surveys at least every two (2) years: (i)  A detailed technology survey for district technology leaders; and (ii)  A detailed survey for teaching staff regarding technology use in the classroom, including analysis of the effectiveness of the Equity in Distance Learning Act (Section 37-68-1 et seq.). (2)  Subject to the direction of the State Board of Education as provided by law, the administration, management and control of the department is * * *hereby vested in the State Superintendent of Public Education, who shall be directly responsible for the rightful functioning thereof. SECTION 14.  Section 37-13-137, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-13-137.  (1)  The State Board of Education shall adopt regulations as provided in this section not later than March 1, 2008, which shall be effective for compliance by school districts beginning with the 2008-2009 school year, for the Child Nutrition School Breakfast and Lunch Programs that are not in conflict with the regulations of the United States Department of Agriculture (USDA).  The regulations shall take into account the most recent and advanced scientific principles regarding good human health and fitness, and the effect of the regulations must be that the good health, well-being and fitness of Mississippi school children shall be advanced.  The regulations shall include, but not be limited to, the following areas: (a)  Healthy food and beverage choices; (b)  Healthy food preparation; (c)  Marketing of healthy food choices to students and staff; (d)  Food preparation ingredients and products; (e)  Minimum and maximum time allotment for students and staff lunch and breakfast periods; (f)  The availability of food items during the lunch and breakfast periods of the Child Nutrition School Breakfast and Lunch Programs; and (g)  Methods to increase participation in the Child Nutrition School Breakfast and Lunch Programs. (2)  The Office of Healthy Schools of the State Department of Education shall provide comprehensive training for superintendents, business managers, food service directors and food service managers of a local school district, or the designees appointed by those individuals for training purposes, as required by the department on marketing healthy foods, creating a healthy cafeteria environment, effective and efficient food service operations, the standards and expectations of food service staff, and other topics as identified by the department.  The department may determine the time and location of the trainings and the frequency with which they are held.  Persons employed by a local school district having the certification as a Food Service Administrator III or IV shall be exempt from the training requirements of this subsection. (3)  Local school districts may adopt rules and regulations that may be more stringent but not in conflict with those adopted by the State Board of Education under this section. (4)  (a)  The Department of Education shall develop guidance to help school districts improve their nutrition programs and their meals per labor hour to ensure efficiency and productivity in food service in schools. (b)  The department shall develop guidance for school districts on using any excess reserves in their nutrition funds for allowable expenses that could contribute to a more efficient nutrition program. (c)  The department shall develop a standardized guide to assist school districts with strategies to increase their breakfast participation rates. SECTION 15.  Section 37-28-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-28-7.  (1)  There is created the Mississippi Charter School Authorizer Board as a state agency with exclusive chartering jurisdiction in the State of Mississippi.  Unless otherwise authorized by law, no other governmental agency or entity may assume any charter authorizing function or duty in any form. (2)  (a)  The mission of the Mississippi Charter School Authorizer Board is to authorize high-quality charter schools, particularly schools designed to expand opportunities for underserved students, consistent with the purposes of this chapter.  Subject to the restrictions and conditions prescribed in this subsection, the Mississippi Charter School Authorizer Board may authorize charter schools within the geographical boundaries of any school district. (b)  The Mississippi Charter School Authorizer Board may approve a maximum of fifteen (15) qualified charter applications during a fiscal year. (c)  In any school district designated as an "A," "B" or "C" school district by the State Board of Education under the accreditation rating system at the time of application, the Mississippi Charter School Authorizer Board may authorize charter schools only if a majority of the members of the local school board votes at a public meeting to endorse the application or to initiate the application on its own initiative. (3)  The Mississippi Charter School Authorizer Board shall consist of seven (7) members, to be appointed as follows: (a)  Three (3) members appointed by the Governor, with one (1) member being from each of the Mississippi Supreme Court Districts. (b)  Three (3) members appointed by the Lieutenant Governor, with one (1) member being from each of the Mississippi Supreme Court Districts. (c)  One (1) member appointed by the State Superintendent of Public Education. All appointments must be made with the advice and consent of the Senate.  In making the appointments, the appointing authority shall ensure diversity among members of the Mississippi Charter School Authorizer Board. (4)  Members appointed to the Mississippi Charter School Authorizer Board collectively must possess strong experience and expertise in public and nonprofit governance, management and finance, public school leadership, assessment, curriculum and instruction, and public education law.  Each member of the Mississippi Charter School Authorizer Board must have demonstrated an understanding of and commitment to charter schooling as a strategy for strengthening public education. (5)  To establish staggered terms of office, the initial term of office for the three (3) Mississippi Charter School Authorizer Board members appointed by the Governor shall be * * *four (4) years and thereafter shall be three (3) years; staggered with one (1) member serving a one (1) year term, one (1) member serving a two (2) year term, and one (1) member serving a three (3) year term; the initial term of office for the three (3) members appointed by the Lieutenant Governor * * *shall be three (3) years and thereafter shall be three (3) years; staggered with one (1) member serving a one (1) year term, one (1) member serving a two (2) year term, and one (1) member serving a three (3) year term; and the initial term of office for the member appointed by the State Superintendent of Public Education shall be two (2) years * * * and thereafter shall be three (3) years.  After the expiration of the initial terms, members of the board shall serve terms of three (3) years from the expiration date of the previous term.  No member may serve more than two (2) consecutive terms.  The initial appointments must be made before * * *September 1, 2013 July 1, 2026. (6)  The Mississippi Charter School Authorizer Board shall meet as soon as practical after September 1, 2013, upon the call of the Governor, and shall organize for business by selecting a chairman and adopting bylaws.  Subsequent meetings shall be called by the chairman. (7)  An individual member of the Mississippi Charter School Authorizer Board may be removed by the board if the member's personal incapacity renders the member incapable or unfit to discharge the duties of the office or if the member is absent from a number of meetings of the board, as determined and specified by the board in its bylaws.  Whenever a vacancy on the Mississippi Charter School Authorizer Board exists, the original appointing authority shall appoint a member for the remaining portion of the term. (8)  No member of the Mississippi Charter School Authorizer Board or employee, agent or representative of the board may serve simultaneously as an employee, trustee, agent, representative, vendor or contractor of a charter school authorized by the board. (9)  The Mississippi Charter School Authorizer Board shall appoint an individual to serve as the Executive Director of the Mississippi Charter School Authorizer Board.  The executive director shall possess the qualifications established by the board which are based on national best practices, and shall possess an understanding of state and federal education law.  The executive director, who shall serve at the will and pleasure of the board, shall devote his full time to the proper administration of the board and the duties assigned to him by the board and shall be paid a salary established by the board, subject to the approval of the State Personnel Board.  Subject to the availability of funding, the executive director may employ such administrative staff as may be necessary to assist the director and board in carrying out the duties and directives of the Mississippi Charter School Authorizer Board. (10)  The Mississippi Charter School Authorizer Board is authorized to obtain suitable office space for administrative purposes.  In acquiring a facility or office space, the authorizer board shall adhere to all policies and procedures required by the Department of Finance and Administration and the Public Procurement Review Board. SECTION 16.  Section 37-28-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-28-11.  (1)  To cover the costs of overseeing charter schools in accordance with this chapter, the authorizer shall receive up to three percent (3%) of annual per-pupil allocations received by a charter school from state and local funds for each charter school it authorizes. (2)  The authorizer may receive appropriate gifts, grants and donations of any kind from any public or private entity to carry out the purposes of this chapter, subject to all lawful terms and conditions under which the gifts, grants or donations are given. (3)  The authorizer may expend its resources, seek grant funds and establish partnerships to support its charter school authorizing activities. SECTION 17.  Section 37-37-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-37-1.  (1)  The State Department of Education is * * *hereby authorized and directed to prescribe and formulate for use by all school districts of this state, including municipal separate school districts, adequate accounting systems and other essential financial records which shall be uniform for all of the school districts of this state.  Such uniform system shall include a method of accounting for and keeping records of all funds received, handled and disbursed by such school district, whether derived from taxation or otherwise, including funds derived from donations, athletic events and other special activities of the school district. The uniform system of accounts so prescribed and formulated by the State Department of Education shall be distributed and disseminated to all of the school districts of this state and it shall be mandatory that the boards of trustees of all such school districts install, utilize and follow said uniform system of accounts in keeping the financial records of the school district.  At the request of the Mississippi Department of Education, the Office of the State Auditor shall provide advice for implementation of this section. (2)  The Department of Education shall annually review its Accounting Manual for School Districts to determine whether it should make revisions that would assist school districts in providing greater detail, clarity and accuracy of district revenues and expenses.  The department shall report any recommendations to the State Board of Education, the Mississippi House and Senate Education committees, and the PEER Committee no later than December 14 of each year. SECTION 18.  Section 37-41-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-41-13.  (1)  All routes shall be laid out so as to place all pupils entitled to transportation within a reasonable distance of same.  No child entitled to transportation shall be required to walk a greater distance than one (1) mile to reach the vehicle of transportation in the morning or to reach his or her home in the afternoon. (2) The State Department of Education shall develop guidance for school districts to use in assessing and optimizing bus routes with the goal of improving transportation services and reducing costs. SECTION 19.  Section 37-151-211, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-151-211.  (1)  (a) Before February 1 of each year, the tax assessor of each county shall file reports with the State Department of Education which provide information essential to the department in determining the local contribution that each school district or charter school is required to provide toward the cost of local school funding.  A separate report must be filed for each school district or part of a school district situated in the county and must include the following information: (i)  The total assessed valuation of nonexempt property for school purposes in each school district; (ii)  Assessed value of exempt property owned by homeowners aged sixty-five (65) or older or disabled, as defined in Section 27-33-67(2); (iii)  The school district's tax loss from exemptions provided to applicants under the age of sixty-five (65) and not disabled, as defined in Section 27-33-67(1); and (iv)  The school district's homestead reimbursement revenues. (b)  The State Department of Education shall prepare and make available to the tax assessor of each county a form for the reports required under paragraph (a) of this subsection (1)(a). (2)  (a)  The department shall use the information submitted pursuant to subsection (1) to calculate and certify to each school district the millage required to raise its minimum local tax effort, which must be the value of not less than twenty-eight (28) mills for the then current fiscal year or a millage rate equivalent to twenty-seven percent (27%) of the total funding formula funds for the school district, any charter schools, and any Mississippi Achievement School District Schools located in its boundaries, whichever is a lesser amount as certified to the school district by the department, upon all of the taxable property of the school district, including the following sources: (i)   One hundred percent (100%) of Grand Gulf income, as prescribed in Section 27-35-309; and (ii)  One hundred percent (100%) of any fees in lieu of taxes, as prescribed in Section 27-31-104, in accordance with Section 37-57-1. (b)  The department shall determine the local contribution of each school district or charter school based on the minimum local tax effort, as determined under paragraph (a), and shall certify this required local contribution to each school district or charter school, as follows: (i)  For school districts in which there are no charter schools, the minimum local tax effort is the required local contribution for the school district. (ii)  For school districts in which there is located one or more charter schools, the local contribution of the school district is the product of multiplying the local pro rata amount by the net enrollment of the school district.  The department will calculate the local pro rata amount by dividing the school district's minimum local tax effort by the sum of the net enrollment of the school district * * *, as determined by Section 37‑151‑207, and the * * *projected net enrollment of charter school students * * *, as specified in Section 37‑151‑207, who reside or are estimated to reside in the district * * *, but excluding from this projected enrollment any resident students who are projected to transfer from the district to a charter school after the calculation of the district's net enrollment, so as not to double‑count those students.  The department shall calculate net enrollment under this paragraph (b) based on each school district's and each charter school's actual enrollment for months two (2) and three (3) of the school year for which the local ad valorem funds are being distributed.  These net enrollment figures shall be used solely for determining the local pro rata amount and the local contribution under this paragraph (b), and shall not modify, replace or affect any enrollment, average daily membership, or projected enrollment calculation used for the Mississippi Student Funding Formula (MSFF) or for any other funding calculation under this chapter. (iii)  For each charter school, the local contribution is the sum of the local pro rata amount for each charter school student * * *, as determined by Section 37‑151‑207, based on each student's district of residence.  The department will calculate a local pro rata amount for each school district in which a student * * *projected to attend attending the charter school resides or is estimated to reside using the methodology in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph (b). (iv)  In the case of an agricultural high school, the local contribution is based on an equitable amount per pupil, as determined by the State Board of Education.  The State Board of Education shall set the millage requirement to generate such an amount and will certify this amount and millage requirement to agricultural high schools in the same manner as for all other school districts under this subsection. (3)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 37-151-213(1), the required state share in support of each school district and charter school is determined by subtracting the required local contribution, which total amount may not exceed twenty-seven percent (27%) of the total projected funding formula cost, from the total projected funding formula cost, as determined under Sections 37-151-200 through 37-151-215, for the school district or charter school. (4)  If the school board of any school district or charter school governing board determines that it is not economically feasible or practicable to operate any school within the district or charter school for the full one hundred eighty (180) days required for the school term of a scholastic year under Section 37-13-63, due to an enemy attack, man-made, technological, or natural disaster in which the Governor has declared a disaster emergency under the laws of this state or the President of the United States has declared an emergency or major disaster to exist in this state, the school board or charter school governing board may notify the State Department of Education of the disaster and submit a plan for altering the school term.  If the State Board of Education finds the disaster to be the cause of the school not operating for the contemplated school term and that the school is located in a school district covered by the Governor's or President's disaster declaration, the board may permit the schools located in that district to be operated for less than one hundred eighty (180) days and, in such case, the State Department of Education may not reduce the state share in support of the funding formula for that district or charter school because of the failure to operate those schools for one hundred eighty (180) days. SECTION 20.  Section 47-5-579, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 47-5-579.  (1)  (a)  The corporation shall operate a work initiative at the Central Mississippi Correctional Facility, South Mississippi Correctional Institution, Mississippi State Penitentiary and the Mississippi Correctional Institute for Women, and is authorized, in its discretion, to create a work initiative at any other correctional facility listed in Section 47-5-539(d).  In lieu of a work initiative created by the corporation, the warden or superintendent or sheriff at any regional and private facility listed in Section 47-5-539 is authorized to create a work initiative at their respective facility consistent with the provisions and requirements of this section.  Each initiative shall be limited to no more than twenty-five (25) inmates in the state, regional or private facility at any given time. (b)  The department, with regard to a work initiative in an MDOC facility, shall: (i)  Have the ultimate authority for oversight of the administration of the initiative; (ii)  Delegate the administration of the initiative to the corporation; and (iii)  Oversee the selection of inmates for admission to the initiative. (c)  The sheriff, with regard to a work initiative at a regional facility, shall: (i)  Have the ultimate authority for oversight of the administration of the initiative; (ii)  Oversee the selection of inmates for admission to the initiative; and (iii)  Work with the department and the corporation to establish guidelines for the initiative and develop a report thereon. (2)  (a)  An inmate is eligible for participation in the initiative if the inmate has: (i)  No more than two (2) years remaining on the inmate's sentence; (ii)  Not been convicted under Section 97-9-49 within the last five (5) years; and (iii)  Not been sentenced for a sex offense as defined in Section 45-33-23(h). (b)  Any inmate who meets the eligibility requirements of paragraph (a) may request assignment to a work initiative established under this section. (3)  (a)  The commissioner, in the case of MDOC facilities, or the warden, superintendent, sheriff or similar leader in the case of regional and private facilities, shall select inmates for admission to the program. (b)  An inmate currently participating in vocational training or a soft skills training program at a facility authorized to operate a work initiative shall have priority in admission to the program. (4)  (a)  The chief executive officer, in the case of MDOC facilities, or the warden, superintendent, sheriff or similar leader in the case of regional and private facilities, may authorize the inmate to participate in educational or other rehabilitative programs designed to supplement his work initiative employment or to prepare the person for successful reentry. (b)  Before accepting any participants to the program, the corporation, in consultation with the department, shall adopt and publish rules and regulations to effectuate this section no later than six (6) months after the effective date of this section. These rules and regulations shall include all protection requirements for work release programs established pursuant to Sections 47-5-451 through 47-5-471. (5)  Participating employers shall pay no less than the prevailing wage for the position and shall under no circumstance pay less than the federal minimum wage. (6)  Any inmate assigned to the initiative who, without proper authority or just cause, leaves the area to which he has been assigned to work or attend educational or other rehabilitative programs, or leaves the vehicle or route of travel involved in his or her going to or returning from such place, will be guilty of escape as provided in Section 97-9-49.  An offender who is convicted under Section 97-9-49 shall be ineligible for further participation in the work initiative during his or her current term of confinement. (7)  (a)  The inmate shall maintain an account through a local financial institution and shall provide a copy of a check stub to the chief executive officer, the warden, the superintendent or the sheriff at a regional facility, as the case may be. (b)  The inmate shall be required: (i)  To pay twenty-five percent (25%) of the inmate's wages after mandatory deductions for the following purposes: 1.  To pay support of dependents or to the Mississippi Department of Human Services on behalf of dependents as may be ordered by a judge of competent jurisdiction; and 2.  To pay any fines, restitution, or costs as ordered by the court to include any fines and fees associated with obtaining a valid driver's license upon release. (ii)  To pay fifteen percent (15%) of the inmate's wages after mandatory deductions to the corporation for administrative expenses to include transportation costs to be remitted to the state, regional or private facility where the inmate is housed.  In the case of state facilities, the administrative expense reimbursement shall be paid to the corporation; in the case of regional facilities, the administrative expense reimbursement shall be paid to the sheriff's department; in the case of private facilities the administrative expense reimbursement shall be paid to the contractor overseeing the facility. (iii)  To save fifty percent (50%) of the inmate's wages after mandatory deductions in the account required under paragraph (a) of this subsection.  Monies under this subparagraph shall be made available to the inmate upon parole or release. (c)  The inmate shall have access to the remaining ten percent (10%) of the monies in the inmate's account to purchase incidental expenses. (d)  Any monies remaining under paragraph (a) of this subsection after all mandatory deductions are paid, shall be deposited in the inmate's account established under this subsection.  Any monies remaining upon release in paragraph (c) of this subsection shall be released to the inmate. (8)  The chief executive officer of the corporation shall collect and maintain data which shall be shared semiannually with the Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review (PEER) and the Corrections and Criminal Justice Oversight Task Force in sortable electronic format.  The first report shall be made on January 15, 2023, and in six-month intervals thereafter unless PEER establishes a different schedule.  The data shall include: (a)  Total number of participants at the end of each month by race, gender, and offenses charged; (b)  Total number of participants who began the program in each month by race, gender, and offenses charged; (c)  Total number of participants who successfully completed the program in each month by race, gender, and offenses charged; (d)  Total number of participants who left the program in each month and reason for leaving by race, gender, and offenses charged; (e)  Total number of participants who were arrested for a new criminal offense while in the program in each month by race, gender and offenses charged; (f)  Total number of participants who were convicted of a new crime while in the program in each month by race, gender and offenses charged; (g)  Total number of participants who completed the program and were convicted of a new crime within three (3) years of completing the program; (h)  Total amount earned by participants and how the earnings were distributed in each month; (i)  Results of any initial risk and needs assessments conducted on each participant by race, gender, and offenses charged; (j)  List of participating employers; (k)  List of jobs acquired by participants; (l)  List of the hourly wage paid to each participant; (m)  Accounting of the manner and use of the * * *ten percent (10%) fifteen percent (15%) of the wages paid to the corporation by the inmate for administrative expenses; (n)  Total costs associated with program operations; (o)  List of participating financial institutions; (p)  * * *The number of accounts opened by participants at Participating financial institutions, which must collect, maintain and report the creation date for financial accounts opened by work initiative participants; (q)  The average hourly wage earned in the program; * * * and (r)  Accounting of any dependent support payments, fines, restitutions, fees or costs as ordered by the court for each work initiative participant; (s)  The remaining sentence length of work initiative participants; and (r)  Any other data or information as requested by the task force. (9)  The Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review (PEER) shall conduct a review of the initiative, including any expansion of the initiative authorized under this section, and produce an annual report to the Legislature on their effectiveness by January 1 of each year.  The PEER Committee shall seek the assistance of the Corrections and Criminal Justice Task Force and may seek assistance from any other criminal justice experts it deems necessary during its review. SECTION 21.  Section 73-9-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-9-5.  (1)  For the purpose of this chapter, a dental hygienist shall be an individual who has completed an accredited dental hygiene education program, passed the national dental hygiene board and is licensed by the State Board of Dental Examiners to provide, as an auxiliary to the dentist, preventive care services including, but not limited to, scaling and polishing.  In fulfilling these services, dental hygienists provide treatment that helps to prevent oral disease such as dental caries and periodontal disease and for educating patients in prevention of these and other dental problems. (2)  No person shall practice dental hygiene in a manner that is separate or independent from a supervising dentist, or establish or maintain an office or a practice that is primarily devoted to the provision of dental hygiene services. (3)  Under general supervision, a dental hygienist may provide to patients of record, for not more than ten (10) consecutive business days, all dental hygiene services (except the administration of nitrous oxide inhalation or local anesthesia, which must be under direct supervision) if all of the following conditions are satisfied: (a)  The dental hygienist has practiced dental hygiene in the State of Mississippi for a minimum of five (5) years, such five-year period having been determined by the board as equivalent to a minimum of six thousand (6,000) hours of dental hygiene practice; (b)  The dental hygienist * * *has submits evidence of current CPR certification and completion within the previous twelve (12) months of three (3) hours of board approved continuing dental education focused on medical emergencies, and complies with the established protocols for emergencies that the supervising dentist has established; (c)  The supervising dentist examined the patient of record not more than seven (7) months before the date that the dental hygienist provides the dental hygiene services; (d)  The dental hygienist provides dental hygiene services to the patient of record in accordance with a written treatment protocol prescribed by the supervising dentist for the patient; (e)  The patient of record is notified in advance of the appointment that the supervising dentist will be absent from the location; (f)  No licensed dental hygienist, under general supervision, may delegate or supervise any dental hygiene duties for a dental assistant; and (g)  The supervising dentist is responsible for all actions of the dental hygienist during treatment of patients under general supervision. (4)  The following limitations also apply to the practice of dental hygiene under general supervision: (a)  No entity may employ dental hygienists to provide treatment for patients of record under general supervision other than: (i)  A nonprofit entity that meets the statutory, regulatory and program requirements for grantees supported by the Public Health Service and that has supervision by a Mississippi licensed dentist; * * * or (ii)  An office owned by a dentist or group of dentists licensed in Mississippi * * *.; (iii)  A licensed nursing home as defined by Section 73-17-5; (iv)  An institution for the aged or infirm as defined by Section 43-11-1; or (v)  A public or private prison, detention center or other correctional facility. (b)  No duly licensed and registered dentist shall supervise more than three (3) dental hygienists under general supervision at any one time. (c)  No duly licensed and registered dentist shall supervise a dental hygienist for more than ten (10) consecutive business days * * * or for more than twenty‑four (24) total days in any calendar year. (d)  No patient may be seen twice consecutively under general supervision. (e)  An examination fee must not be charged if a patient is seen under general supervision. (f)  The patient undergoing dental hygiene services under general supervision must be a minimum of eighteen (18) years of age * * *, and either ASA Class I or ASA Class II as defined by the American Society of Anesthesiologist Physical Status Classification System. (g)  In the settings described in paragraph (a)(iii) through (v) of this subsection (4), a dental hygienist practicing under general supervision may provide only non-invasive routine services, including oral prophylaxis, topical fluoride treatments, dental sealants, oral health screenings and patient education.  A dental hygienist practicing under general supervision in these settings shall not perform any invasive procedures, including tooth scaling and root planning, or any other procedure that requires the physical presence of a supervising dentist under direct supervision. (5)  Notwithstanding the above subsections of this section, a dental hygienist licensed in Mississippi may perform radiographs, oral prophylaxis, and place fluoride varnish without a Mississippi licensed dentist being physically present in the office if all of the other conditions of this section are met. * * * (6)  The board shall be authorized to assess the need for dental hygiene services in nursing facilities and correctional facilities and authorize the general supervision of dental hygienists in those facilities, provided that such dental hygiene services are provided in accordance with all of the conditions of this section. SECTION 22.  Section 5-3-61, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 5-3-61.  The committee shall issue performance evaluation reports and expenditure review reports, favorable or unfavorable, of any agency examined, and such reports shall be a public record. A copy of the report, signed by the chairman of the committee, including committee recommendations, shall be submitted to the governor, to each member of the legislature, and to the official, officer, or person in charge of the agency examined. SECTION 23. Sections 57-89-1, 57-89-3 and 57-89-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, which establish incentives for local motion picture production, shall stand repealed on January 1, 2027. SECTION 24. Section 57-89-51, Mississippi Code of 1972, which establishes incentives for local television production incentives, shall stand repealed on January 1, 2027. SECTION 25.  Nothing in this act shall affect or defeat any claim, assessment, appeal, suit, right or cause of action for taxes due or accrued under the ad valorem tax laws before the date on which the applicable sections of this act become effective, whether such claims, assessments, appeals, suits or actions have been begun before the date on which the applicable sections of this act become effective or are begun thereafter; and the provisions of the ad valorem tax laws are expressly continued in full force, effect and operation for the purpose of the assessment, collection and enrollment of liens for any taxes due or accrued and the execution of any warrant under such laws before the date on which the applicable sections of this act become effective, and for the imposition of any penalties, forfeitures or claims for failure to comply with such laws. SECTION 26.  Sections 23 and 24 of this act shall take effect from and after January 1, 2027. Section 15 of this act shall take effect from and after its passage.  The remaining sections of this act shall take effect from and after July 1, 2026, and shall stand repealed on June 30, 2026.